Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 3, Chapter 282, O.S.L.


2022, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 47, 1st Extraordinary


Session, O.S.L. 2023 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 3-103), is amended


to read as follows:

Req. No. 2498 Page 1


Section 3-103. A. The Executive Director of Service Oklahoma


shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of


the Senate. The Executive Director shall serve at the pleasure of


the Governor and may be removed or replaced without cause.


Compensation for the Executive Director shall be determined pursuant


to Section 3601.2 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The


Executive Director may be removed from office by a two-thirds (2/3)


vote of the members elected to and constituting each chamber of the


Oklahoma Legislature or as provided for in Section 2 of this act.


B. The Executive Director of Service Oklahoma shall be the


chief executive officer of Service Oklahoma and shall act for


Service Oklahoma in all matters except as may be otherwise provided


by law. The powers and duties of the Executive Director shall


include, but not be limited to:


1. Organize Service Oklahoma in a manner to efficiently achieve


the objectives of Service Oklahoma;


2. Supervise all activities of Service Oklahoma;


3. Administer programs and policies of Service Oklahoma;


4. Employ, discharge, appoint, contract, and fix duties and


compensation of employees at the discretion of the Executive


Director;


5. Appoint assistants, deputies, officers, investigators,


attorneys, and other employees as may be necessary to carry out


functions of Service Oklahoma;

Req. No. 2498 Page 2


6. Prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of Service


Oklahoma;


7. Provide input and recommendations to the Service Oklahoma


Operator Board on all matters including branding and physical


standardization requirements, customer service metrics, analysis,


and improvement processes for licensed operators, and processes for


termination of licensed operators for failure to comply with the


customer service metrics;


8. Establish internal policies and procedures;


9. Prescribe and provide suitable forms deemed necessary to


carry out the functions of Service Oklahoma and any other laws the


enforcement and administration of which are vested in Service


Oklahoma;


10. Establish such divisions, sections, committees, advisory


committees, offices, and positions in Service Oklahoma as the


Executive Director deems necessary to carry out the functions of


Service Oklahoma;


11. Accept and disburse grants, allotments, gifts, devises,


bequests, funds, appropriations, and other property made or offered


to Service Oklahoma; and


12. Create the budget for Service Oklahoma to be submitted to


the Legislature each year.


C. The salary and other expenses for the Executive Director


shall be budgeted as a separate line item through Service Oklahoma.

Req. No. 2498 Page 3


The operating expenses of Service Oklahoma shall be set by the


Executive Director and shall be budgeted as a separate line item


through Service Oklahoma.


D. 1. The Executive Director of Service Oklahoma shall direct


all purchases, hiring, procurement, and budget for Service Oklahoma


and establish, implement, and enforce policies and procedures


related thereto, consistent with the Oklahoma Central Purchasing


Act. Service Oklahoma and the Executive Director shall be subject


to the requirements of the Public Competitive Bidding Act of 1974,


the Oklahoma Lighting Energy Conservation Act, and the Public


Facilities Act.


2. The Executive Director of Service Oklahoma, or any employee


or agent of the Executive Director of Service Oklahoma acting within


the scope of delegated authority, shall have the same power and


authority related to purchases, hiring, procurement, and budget for


Service Oklahoma as outlined in paragraph 1 of this subsection for


Service Oklahoma as the State Purchasing Director has for all


acquisitions used or consumed by state agencies as established in


the Oklahoma Central Purchasing Act. Such authority shall,


consistent with the authority granted to the State Purchasing


Director, include the power to designate financial or proprietary


information submitted by a bidder confidential and reject all


requests to disclose the information so designated, if the Executive


Director of Service Oklahoma requires the bidder to submit the

Req. No. 2498 Page 4


financial or proprietary information with a bid, proposal, or


quotation.


E. Service Oklahoma shall determine the compensation to be


retained by licensed operators.


1. Before the last day in September in every even-numbered


year, Service Oklahoma shall review the compensation paid to


licensed operators and, if necessary, change the compensation.


Service Oklahoma shall engage an independent third party to evaluate


the compensation paid to licensed operators who shall provide any


recommendations no later than November 1 in the even-numbered year.


Any recommended change in licensed operator compensation shall be


finalized by Service Oklahoma no later than the third Tuesday of


November in the even-numbered year. Notice of such recommendation


shall be provided to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore and the


Chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate, and the Speaker


and the Chair of the Appropriations and Budget Committee of the


House of Representatives.


2. Any change in licensed operator compensation, unless


rejected or amended as provided by this subsection, shall become


effective on July 1 of the following calendar year. Any amendment


passed by a majority vote of each house of the Legislature shall


become effective as provided by the amendment unless vetoed by the


Governor.



Req. No. 2498 Page 5


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-110.6 of Title 47, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “personally identifiable


information” means an individual’s:


1. Full legal name;


2. Date of birth;


3. Gender;


4. Driver license or identification card number;


5. Biometric data, including but not limited to digital facial


photographs, facial biometrics, finger images, and minutia data;


6. Address of principal residence; and


7. Signature.


This definition shall not be construed as including an


individual’s Social Security number.


B. Personally identifiable information required to be provided


during the application process for a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or Identification Card shall be stored in a separate and


siloed database from the database used to store personally


identifiable information provided to receive a REAL ID Compliant


Driver License or Identification Card.


C. 1. Any applicant for a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License


or Identification Card, except as provided for in paragraph 3 of



Req. No. 2498 Page 6


this subsection, may request a biometric data waiver from Service


Oklahoma.


2. Upon the acceptance of such waiver, Service Oklahoma shall:


a. provide a paper receipt to the waiver applicant,


confirming acceptance of such waiver,


b. delete all personally identifiable information and any


duplication of such information related to the waiver


applicant within ninety (90) days of collection,


c. not utilize any personally identifiable information


related to the waiver applicant for any purpose other


than the performance of background checks to determine


if the applicant has a currently issued license or


identification card under a different name or


identity,


d. not provide any personally identifiable information


related to the waiver applicant to any third-party


entity for any purpose, and


e. not provide any personally identifiable information


related to the waiver applicant to any court,


governmental entity, or law enforcement agency without


a valid warrant.


3. An applicant for a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or


Identification Card with a felony conviction shall be disqualified


from requesting such waiver.

Req. No. 2498 Page 7


D. No applicant for a renewal of a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or Identification Card shall be required to provide


additional personally identifiable information at the time of


renewal if such applicant can produce the valid REAL ID Noncompliant


Driver License or Identification Card the applicant is seeking to


renew.


E. Service Oklahoma shall issue a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver


License or Identification Card that lacks a photo to an otherwise


qualified applicant who requests an exemption from such photo on the


basis of religious belief. The application process for such


applicant shall instead require the fingerprinting of each of the


applicant’s index fingers; the results of such fingerprinting and


any duplications of such shall be deleted within ninety (90) days of


collection.


F. 1. Every six (6) months after the effective date of this


act, Service Oklahoma shall attest via an electronic report to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker


of the House of Representatives that it is in compliance with the


provisions of this section.


2. The Chief Information Officer of the Information Services


Division of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services and the


State Auditor and Inspector shall annually perform a joint review of


Service Oklahoma’s compliance with the provisions of this section


and electronically report the results of such review to the

Req. No. 2498 Page 8


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker


of the House of Representatives.


3. If Service Oklahoma is found to be out of compliance with


the provisions of this section in the joint review provided for in


subparagraph 2 of this subsection, the Executive Director of Service


Oklahoma shall be removed from office effective on the date the


review was reported to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of


the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives.


G. Service Oklahoma shall promulgate rules as necessary to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2498 MSBB 12/10/2025 1:19:05 PM

















Req. No. 2498 Page 9